Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 3

General Provisions

2-6-301. Duplicate registration form filed in binder — Computerized reports — List posted.

In all counties, the attesting official shall update the voter's computerized voter history by making the appropriate data entry. Upon issuance of an absentee ballot, the voter shall not thereafter vote in the election except by absentee ballot, or pursuant to § 2-7-112(a)(3)(A); provided, however, that if the ballot is issued pursuant to § 2-6-502 this subsection (a) does not apply.

All absentee voting applications shall be filed alphabetically by election day in a binder and kept in the county election commission office as a public record through election day. As an alternative, a county election commission may maintain, on a daily basis, absentee voting applications as part of a computer-generated report. Such report is a public record.

The county election commission shall furnish each polling place with a certified copy of a complete alphabetical list of its absentee voters for each election, and the copy shall be displayed at the polling place throughout the voting hours on election day.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-615; Acts 1981, ch. 241, § 1; 1981, ch. 335, § 1; 1988, ch. 993, § 6; T.C.A., §2-6-115; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2; 1995, ch. 69, § 1; 2010, ch. 636, § 1; 2018, ch. 726, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in the second sentence of (a), substituted “shall” for “may” and inserted “, or pursuant to §2-7-112(a)(3)(A)” preceding the proviso.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 726, § 3. April 18, 2018.

2-6-302. Central absentee ballot counting board.

The county election commission shall appoint registered voters of the county to constitute a central absentee ballot counting board to count the ballots cast under this chapter.

The board shall consist of one (1) officer of elections and three (3) judges appointed subject to § 2-4-104. To count the ballots properly and with reasonable speed the commission may, if necessary, appoint additional judges subject to § 2-4-105.

The board shall be assisted by the administrator of elections or other personnel of the county election commission.

The officer and judges shall be compensated at the same rate as other election officials.

The counting board shall be located at a location designated by the county election commission. Notice of the location shall be published in conjunction with the notice of election required by § 2-12-111(c) and shall not be changed except in the event of an emergency.

If the county election commission determines that there are fewer than one hundred (100) absentee ballots to be counted, the county election commission may act as the central absentee ballot counting board without additional compensation.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-616; Acts 1992, ch. 895, § 2; T.C.A., §2-6-116; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2; 2003, ch. 352, § 7; 2008, ch. 928, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-6-303. Delivery of poll books and other records to board — Process of ballots.

No later than four (4) hours prior to the closing of polls for all regularly scheduled November elections and no later than two (2) hours prior to the closing of polls for all other elections, or at such earlier time after the polls open as the county election commission may direct, on election day, the county election commission shall deliver the locked and sealed absentee ballot boxes and their keys to the counting board in the commission office.

The county election commission shall also deliver to the counting board the poll books prepared by precinct by the administrator of elections as the absentee ballots were received, the binder of rejected absentee ballots by precinct, the absentee voting binder of duplicate permanent registration records by precinct, and any other supplies necessary or useful in the performance of the counting board's duties. However, in those counties in which computerized duplicate registration records are used, the administrator shall be relieved of the duty to deliver the absentee voting binder of duplicate permanent registration records by precincts. In counties in which computerized duplicate permanent registration records are used, the county election commission shall deliver to the counting board a printed list, arranged by precinct, of those voters who voted or requested an absentee ballot.

Any absentee ballot received by mail by the county election commission before the closing of the polls shall be processed as were absentee ballots received before election day. For ballots received after the ballot boxes are turned over to the counting board, the administrator shall not record the voters' names on the poll books or note that they voted on their duplicate permanent registration records but shall deliver the ballots to the counting board immediately after determining whether the ballots are entitled to be cast.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-617; Acts 1981, ch. 385, § 5; 1988, ch. 993, § 7; 1993, ch. 518, §§ 13, 21; T.C.A., §2-6-117; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2; 2016, ch. 827, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment, at the beginning of (a)(1), substituted “No later than four (4) hours prior to the closing of polls for all regularly scheduled November elections and no later than two (2) hours prior to the closing of polls for all other elections,” for “At four o’clock p.m. (4:00 p.m.) prevailing time,”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 827, § 7. April 21, 2016.

Cross-References. Failure to use standard time, §4-1-401.

Inspection of ballot boxes before election, §2-7-109.

Sealed absentee ballots, §2-6-311.

2-6-304. Procedure of counting board.

The absentee ballot counting board shall unlock and open each ballot box in the presence of a majority of the judges and break the seals upon verification that the numbers are the same. All of the sealed absentee ballot envelopes with attached affidavits and early voting ballots shall be removed from the respective ballot boxes. If there is no challenge to a ballot, the counting board shall tear the affidavit from the absentee ballot envelope leaving the envelope sealed. All affidavits so removed shall be gathered together and placed in envelopes provided for that purpose for each election being held.

A majority of the counting board officials shall certify the envelopes for each precinct in substantially the following form:

Affidavits removed from sealed absentee ballots of absent voters who voted in the precinct in the election on the day of , 20 , in County, State of Tennessee. We hereby certify that we have sealed this envelope before opening any of the sealed absentee ballot envelopes containing ballots.

Name and Title Name and Title

Name and Title Name and Title

If any absentee ballot is rejected for any reason by the administrator of elections or by the counting board, such absentee ballot envelope shall not be opened nor its affidavit removed, but it shall be marked “Rejected” across its face with the reasons for rejection written on it and signed by each official who rejected it. It shall then be placed in the container of rejected absentee ballots. A list shall be made of such rejected ballots, and the administrator shall notify the voters by mail of the rejection.

The counting board official shall then open the sealed absentee ballot envelopes, remove the absentee ballots and count and record the absentee ballot votes and the early voting ballot votes. In no event may the votes for any candidate be totaled until after all polls in the county are closed.

When a counting board receives ballots which the county election commission received on election day before the close of the polls, it shall write on the voter's duplicate permanent registration record that the voter has voted absentee in the election and record the voter's name on the absentee poll book. At the close of the polls the counting board shall make a certificate for such ballots substantially in the form of the certificate required by subsection (a).

If a county election commission authorizes the use of a mechanical or electronic voting machine for early voting, the commission shall remove the vote totals according to rules promulgated by the coordinator of elections. Votes must be removed from the machines in such a manner so that no vote totals can be associated with any candidate at the time of removal. In addition, the election commission shall be required to provide notice to all candidates and political parties of the place and time when the vote totals will be removed from those voting machines. In no event may the votes for any candidate be totaled until after all polls in the county are closed.

Not later than forty-five (45) days after an election, the chair of the county election commission shall certify the results of absentee balloting to the state election coordinator. Failure to so certify shall be grounds for removal from office under title 8, chapter 47.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 718, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-618; Acts 1988, ch. 993, § 8; 1993, ch. 518, §§ 14, 21; T.C.A., §2-6-118; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2; 1995, ch. 88, §§ 7, 8, 10; 2009, ch. 218, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Cross-References. Sealed absentee ballots, §2-6-311.

Attorney General Opinions. Absentee and early voting ballots may not be totaled—and thus may not be released—until all polling places in the county are closed. Under T.C.A. §2-7-127, polling places are closed only when all persons waiting in line to vote at the time set for closing have voted. OAG 19-12, 2019 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (8/26/2019).

2-6-305. Election laws applicable.

The provisions of chapter 7 of this title with respect to challenge and poll watchers apply to the central absentee ballot counting board. A poll watcher may not leave and reenter the absentee ballot counting after the challenge process has been completed and the counting board begins to count the votes without the permission of the administrator of elections or the administrator's designee.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 2-619, 2-6-119; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-6-306. Absentee voter dying prior to election day — Disposition of ballot.

If an absentee voter has voted before an election and such absentee voter dies before election day, the county election commission shall count such voter's ballot or vote. The casting of a proper ballot by a person who dies before the day of the election does not invalidate the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-620; Acts 1993, ch. 518, §§ 16, 21; T.C.A., §2-6-120; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2.

2-6-307. Disposition of registration records after election.

Except in those counties which use computerized duplicate registration records, the administrator of elections shall take the duplicate permanent registration records from the early voting duplicate permanent registration binders and put them in the regular duplicate permanent registration books within two (2) weeks after the election, unless an election contest has been initiated. Temporary registration records shall be filed together with the records of the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-621; Acts 1988, ch. 993, § 9; T.C.A., §2-6-121; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-6-308. Early and absentee voting applications — Uniform forms.

The coordinator of elections shall adopt uniform forms for each county election commission for an application for early voting and absentee voting.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1977, ch. 213, § 1; 1978, ch. 814, § 4; 1978, ch. 861, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 2-623, 2-6-123; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2.

Cross-References. Absentee voting by mail by armed forces personnel, §2-6-502.

Filling out application, §2-6-203.

Special write-in absentee ballots, §2-6-503.

2-6-309. Absentee ballot envelope — Requirements — Voter's affidavit form.

The absentee ballot envelope shall have a sealing flap and shall be a plain envelope without markings except the words “Absentee Ballot Envelope” or “ Primary Absentee Ballot Envelope” printed on the face and such instructions for the use of the envelope if it has become prematurely sealed as the coordinator of elections prescribes. The coordinator of elections shall determine distinguishable colors to be used in the printing of the ballot envelopes for early voting and absentee voting. Both envelopes shall include a place for the voter's precinct and district number and a statement for the administrator to sign stating that the voter's signature has been verified and appears to be valid. The absentee voting ballot envelope need not contain a certificate for an attesting official.

It shall have also a detachable flap which shall contain the words “Do Not Detach” and an affidavit in substantially the following form:

VOTER'S AFFIDAVIT

State of

County of

I, , do solemnly swear that I am a resident of Precinct , Ward or District of County, State of Tennessee, and am a registered voter in the election to be held on the day of , 20 .

I further swear that this envelope contains the absentee ballot marked by me in secret indicating my choice at that election, and that I am not registered in any other state or county for this election and I am otherwise entitled to vote absentee in this election.

Signature of Affiant

Witnesses if assisted

(Person who assisted)

Name Address

Name Address

CERTIFICATE OF ATTESTING OFFICIAL

Sworn to and subscribed before me this day of , 20 . I hereby certify that the affiant whose name appears above exhibited the enclosed absentee ballot to me unmarked, marked the ballot in secret (with assistance) and enclosed and sealed it in this envelope without anyone (other than the assistant) seeing how the affiant voted, and the affiant was not solicited or advised by me to vote for or against any candidate or issue in the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1979, ch. 316, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 2-625, 2-6-125; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-6-310. Ballot requirements.

Ballots to be used under this chapter shall be prepared by the county election commission. The ballots shall conform to all the requirements of chapter 5, part 2 of this title with respect to paper ballots except as provided otherwise in this chapter.

Ballots to be used under this chapter shall be printed immediately after the deadline established for withdrawal of candidates but not less than thirty (30) days before the day of the election. In individual cases, the county election commission shall be excused from compliance with the requirement of this subsection (b) that ballots be printed at least thirty (30) days before the day of the election whenever application of constitutional or statutory provisions of law concerning the filling of vacancies in public office renders such compliance impossible or impractical. No person shall be denied an opportunity to cast an absentee ballot as a result of noncompliance by such commission with such thirty (30) day requirement.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-626; Acts 1981, ch. 220, § 1; 1986, ch. 661, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §2-6-126; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2.

2-6-311. Absentee ballot boxes — Requirements.

Absentee ballot boxes shall meet the requirements for standard ballot boxes under § 2-5-214, have at least two (2) hasps for locks, and be equipped with baffles so that ballots cannot be removed without unlocking the box.

The ballot boxes shall be locked at the beginning of absentee voting with one (1) lock from a county election commissioner of one (1) party and another lock provided by a commissioner of another party. The commissioners shall retain the keys personally. The boxes may not be unlocked except when the votes are to be counted.

In addition to the locks required in subsection (b), the county election commission shall place two (2) numbered seals on each ballot box at the beginning of absentee voting with one (1) seal placed by a county election commissioner of each party. Such seal numbers shall be recorded by the administrator of elections and certified in duplicate by one (1) commissioner of each party, and the original shall be forwarded by mail immediately to the office of the coordinator of elections and the duplicate shall be filed in the election commission office. The seals may not be broken except when the votes are to be counted. If a seal or seals are broken, the administrator shall immediately attach new numbered seals and certify in writing to the coordinator of elections the numbers and a description of the circumstances necessitating this action.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-627; Acts 1984, ch. 636, § 2; 1993, ch. 518, §§ 12, 21; T.C.A., §2-6-127; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

2-6-312. Official forms at expense of state.

The coordinator of elections shall prepare and furnish all applications, envelopes, instructions and other official forms for use under this chapter at the expense of the state. With the approval of the coordinator of elections, a county election commission may use its own computer-generated forms.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 2-628, 2-6-128; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.